test/src/morphology/V-pestakseh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - pestäkseh: # Verb 'syntyä, ilmaantua' - full paradigm
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg1: pezemmös
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg2: pezettös
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg3: [pezeh, pezehes]
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl1: pezemmökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl2: pezettökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl3: pestähes
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+RcSg: pezei
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl1: pezei
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl2: pezei
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl3: pestähes

     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg1: pezimmös
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg2: pezittös
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg3: [pezih, pezihes]
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl1: pezimmökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl2: pezittökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl3: pestihes
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcSg: pessyhes
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl1: pessyhes
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl2: pessyhes
     pestäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl3: pestyhes

     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcSg1: pezizimmös
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcSg2: pezizittös
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcSg3: pezizihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcPl1: pezizimmökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcPl2: pezizittökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcPl3: pestäzihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcSg: pezizihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl1: pezizihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl2: pezizihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl3: pestäzihes

     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcSg1: pessyzimmös
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcSg2: pessyzittös
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcSg3: pessyzihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcPl1: pessyzimmökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcPl2: pessyzittökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcPl3: pestähyzihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcSg: pessyzihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl1: pessyzihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl2: pessyzihes
     pestäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl3: pestähyzihes

     pestäkseh+V+Pot+RcSg1: pessemmös
     pestäkseh+V+Pot+RcSg2: pessettös
     pestäkseh+V+Pot+RcSg3: pessehes
     pestäkseh+V+Pot+RcPl1: pessemmökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Pot+RcPl2: pessettökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Pot+RcPl3: pestähes
## This looks like it ought to be _pestänehes_
     pestäkseh+V+Pot+ConNeg+RcSg: pessehes
     pestäkseh+V+Pot+ConNeg+RcPl1: pessehes
     pestäkseh+V+Pot+ConNeg+RcPl2: pessehes
     pestäkseh+V+Pot+ConNeg+RcPl3: pestänehes


     pestäkseh+V+Imprt+RcSg2: pezei
     pestäkseh+V+Imprt+RcSg3: peskähes
     pestäkseh+V+Imprt+RcPl1: peskiämmökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Imprt+RcPl2: peskiättökseh
     pestäkseh+V+Imprt+RcPl3: pestähes
## There must be some Conneg forms as well

     pestäkseh+V+RcPrfPrc: pessyhes
